Hawaii, session 2026, HB2402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 712, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§712-     Promoting gambling in the third degree.  (1) A person commits the offense of promoting gambling in the third degree if the person enters into or remains in or upon the premises where the person knows gambling activity is occurring. (2)  Promoting gambling in the third degree is a misdemeanor." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________